Utah statutes.
54-1-7.   Secretary of commission -- Appointment -- Functions.

The commission may appoint a secretary of the commission, who shall serve at the pleasure of the commission. It shall be the duty of the secretary to keep a full and true record of all the proceedings of the commission and of all determinations, rulings and orders made by the commission, or by any of the commissioners, and of the approval and confirmation by the commission of the determinations, rulings and orders made by individual commissioners or administrative law judges. The secretary shall be the custodian of the records of the commission, and shall file and preserve at its general office all books, profiles, tariffs, schedules, reports, maps and documents, and all papers whatsoever filed with it or entrusted to its care, and the secretary shall be responsible to the commission for the custody thereof. Under the direction of the commission the secretary shall superintend its clerical business, conduct its correspondence, give notice of all hearings, determinations, rulings and orders of the commission, prepare for service papers and notices required by the commission, and perform other duties the commission may prescribe. The secretary shall have power to administer oaths in all parts of the state in all proceedings by or before the commissioners and in all cases or matters pertaining to the duties of the office of secretary. In the absence of the secretary, the commission may designate another individual to perform the secretary's duties.



Amended by Chapter 246, 1983 General Session

